test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-abilinw16_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - abilinõ: # Noun (16) abilinõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Nom: abilinõ
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Gen: abilisõ
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Par: abilist
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Ill: abilistõ
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Ine: [abilisõn, abilisõh, abilisõhn]
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Ela: abilisõst
     abilinõ+N+Sg+All: abilisõlõ
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Ade: abilisõl
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Abl: abilisõlt
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Tra: abilisõs
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Ter: abilisõniq
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Abe: abilisõldaq
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Com: [abilisõgaq, abilisõga]
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Nom: abilisõq
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Gen: [abiliisi, abilistõ]
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Par: abiliisi
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Ill: [abiliisihe, abiliisi, abiliisidõ]
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Ine: [abiliisin, abiliisih, abiliisihn, abilistõn, abilistõh, abilistõhn]
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Ela: [abiliisist, abilistõst]
     abilinõ+N+Pl+All: [abiliisilõ, abilistõlõ]
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Ade: [abiliisil, abilistõl]
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Abl: [abiliisilt, abilistõlt]
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Tra: [abiliisis, abilistõs]
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Ter: [abiliisiniq, abilistõniq]
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Abe: [abiliisildaq, abilistõldaq, abiliisilda, abilistõlda]
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Com: [abiliisigaq, abilistõgaq]
